dictionaries/grc_GR/src/hunspell/hyph_grc_GR.dic
υ2ε1
ϒ2ε1
υ2έ1
ϒ2έ1
υ2ι1
ϒ2ι1
υ2ί1
ϒ2ί1
υ2ο1
ϒ2ο1
υ2ό1
ϒ2ό1
υ2ω1
ϒ2ω1
υ2ώ1
ϒ2ώ1
.ϓ3
.ϓ3
.ύ3
.φ6
.ϕ6
.χ6
.ψ6
ω1
ώ1
ω2ἴ1
ω2ἵ1
ω2ὶ1
ω2ἲ1
ω2ἳ1
ω2ῖ1
ω2ἶ1
ω2ἷ1
ω2ὔ1
ω2ὕ1
ω2ὺ1
ω2ὒ1
ω2ὓ1
ω2ῶ1
ω2ὦ1
ω2ὧ1
ω2ι1
ω2ι1
ω2ί1
ω2υ1
ω2ϒ1
ω2ϓ1
ω2ύ1
